Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-209
Municipality; acquired property and income; exempt from taxation.

Any property acquired by a municipality pursuant to the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 shall be exempt from taxation to the same extent as other property used for public purposes. All income received in connection with the operation by a municipality of any airport or other air navigation facility shall also be exempt from taxation.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 5, p. 159.